Utah statutes.
71-2-2.   Memorials by counties.
(1)  The county legislative body of the several counties may erect and
maintain, appropriate monies for, and contribute to the erection and
maintenance of, memorials to the memory of veterans of the several wars in
which the United States of America participated.
(2)  Memorials may be in the form of grave adornments, public buildings,
monuments, recreational areas and facilities, parks, and public places;
provided, that no county legislative body may erect and maintain, assist in,
or contribute to, the erection or maintenance of any memorial which is outside
of the boundaries of the county.
